Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 6
SEWER CONNECTIONS - COMPULSORY

31-35-601. Owner to be notified.

In addition to the powers already had by municipalities, they have the following powers: When the governing body of a municipality having a public sewerage system deems it necessary for the protection of public health that owners of one or more premises connect their premises with the public sewer, thirty days' notice in writing shall be given to said owners, by registered mail, notifying them to connect their premises with the sewer, the date of the notice to begin as of the date of registering the same for mailing. If the work of making the connection is not begun within thirty days, the mayor shall notify the municipal engineer to prepare plans and specifications for making the connection with the public sewer, including water and service pipe for flushing purposes, if the owner has given notice and proof to the governing body or mayor of his financial inability to make the connection himself and if it is only for the necessary connection of a water closet or a privy in an outhouse or both.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1264, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-501 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-602. Resolution adopted.

The plans or specifications shall be filed in the clerk's or engineer's office, and a resolution shall be adopted by the governing body ordering or prescribing in general terms the contemplated sewerage connections, giving location of the premises and the name of the owner, and authorizing the clerk to advertise for bids. The advertisement for bids shall be the same as is now provided for in other cases in which municipalities receive bids. The governing body shall let the contract to the lowest responsible bidder who furnishes satisfactory security, but it has the right to reject all bids.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1264, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-502 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-603. Cost of connection ascertained.

The entire costs of all sewerage and water connections, closets, equipment pipe, sewer pipe, labor, and necessary engineering, legal, and publication expenses shall be ascertained by the governing body, including an additional amount of six percent for costs of inspection, collections, and other incidentals. The cost to each owner shall be determined according to the material used and work done under the contract in connecting such property to the public sewer and water main. The engineering, legal, and publication expenses shall be charged in such proportion as each connection bears to the whole.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1265, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-503 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-604. Work accepted - assessment - certified copy filed - lien.

Upon the final completion of the work, the governing body shall accept the same by ordinance and provide for an assessment against the properties connected according to the rules of apportionment as provided in section 31-35-603. Each assessment shall be separately numbered. Thirty days after the last publication of said ordinance, a certified copy of it shall be filed with the county treasurer of the county in which the property is situated and when so filed shall operate as a perpetual tax lien in favor of the municipality and shall be superior to all other liens except general tax liens.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1265, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-504 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-605. Appropriation from general fund.

The governing body may make adequate appropriations from the general fund to defray such costs until such time as the taxes are received, and when received, the general fund shall be reimbursed to the amount of any such appropriation.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1265, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-505 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-606. Assessments payable - proviso.

The assessment shall be due and payable within thirty days after final publication of the assessing ordinance without demand; except that all assessments, at the election of the owner, may be paid in installments, as provided in section 31-35-608.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1265, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-506 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-607. Payment in installments optional.

Failure to pay the whole assessment within said thirty days shall be conclusively considered and held to be an election on the part of the persons interested, whether under disability or not, to pay in such installments. All persons so electing to pay in installments shall be conclusively held and considered as consenting to said improvements, and such election shall be conclusively held and considered as a waiver of any right to question the power or jurisdiction of the municipality to construct the improvement, the quality of the work, the regularity or sufficiency of the proceedings, or the validity or the correctness of the assessments or the validity of the lien thereof.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1265, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-507 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-608. Installment payments - due date - interest.

In case of such election to pay in such installments, the assessment shall be payable in two or more equal annual installments of principal, the first of which installments shall be payable as prescribed by the governing body in not more than one year, with interest in all cases on the unpaid principal, payable semiannually, at a rate not exceeding six percent per annum. The number of installments, the period of payment, and the rate of interest shall be determined by the governing body and set forth in the assessing ordinance.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1265, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-508 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-609. Default in payment - penalty.

Failure to pay any installment, whether of principal or interest, when due shall cause the whole of the unpaid principal to become due and collectible immediately, and the whole amount of the unpaid principal and accrued interest shall thereafter draw interest at the rate of one percent per month or fraction of a month until the date of sale, as provided in section 31-35-611. At any time prior to the date of sale, the owner may pay the amount of all unpaid installments, with interest at one percent per month or fraction of a month, and all penalties accrued and shall thereupon be restored to the right thereafter to pay in installments in the same manner as if default had not been suffered. The owner of any property not in default as to any installment or payment may at any time pay the whole of the unpaid principal with the interest accruing to the maturity of the next installment of interest or principal.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1266, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-509 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-610. Discount for cash payment.

Payments may be made to the municipal treasurer at any time within thirty days of the final publication of the assessing ordinance, and an allowance of five percent shall be allowed on all payments made during such period, but not thereafter. At the expiration of the thirty-day period, the municipal treasurer shall return the local assessment roll to the clerk, therein showing all payments made thereon with the date of each payment.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1266, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-510 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-611. Payment of assessments - default - sale.

The county treasurer shall receive payment of all assessments on the assessment roll, with interest, and, in the case of default in the payment of any installment of principal or interest when due, shall advertise and sell any and all property concerning which such default is suffered for the payment of the whole of the unpaid assessments thereon. The advertisements and sales shall be at the same times, in the same manner, under all the same conditions and penalties, and with the same effect as is provided by general law for sales of real property in default of payment of general and special taxes.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1266, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-511 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-612. Owner of interest may pay his share.

The owner of any divided or undivided interest in the property assessed may pay his share of any assessment upon producing evidence of the extent of his interest which is satisfactory to the treasurer having the roll in charge.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1266, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-512 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-613. When collections paid to municipality.

All collections made by the county treasurer upon such assessment roll in any calendar month shall be accounted for and paid over to the municipal treasurer on or before the tenth day of the next month, with separate statements for all such collections for each improvement.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1266, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-513 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-614. Construction of part 6.

Nothing in this part 6 shall be considered as amending or repealing any other power the municipalities may have, but this part 6 confers additional powers of which the municipality may take advantage.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1266, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-514 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-615. Governing body to fix rates and charges.

The governing body of any municipality or incorporated sewer or sanitary district may by ordinance fix such rates and charges for the connections with and use of the sewer or sewerage systems of said municipalities or districts as may be just, reasonable, and necessary, and it may provide the manner of levying and collecting such rates and charges.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1266, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-515 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-616. Revenue kept in separate fund.

The revenue derived from the connections with said sewer or sewerage systems shall be placed in the treasury of the municipality or district and may be kept in a separate fund. If the revenue is placed in a separate fund, it shall not be paid out or distributed except for the purpose of operating, renewing, improving, or extending the sewerage system and the payment of the salaries of the employees engaged in operating said sewerage system. At any time there is a surplus of such funds, it shall be semiannually placed in a sinking fund for the purposes of acquiring, renewing, or extending such sewerage system or making renewals or extensions thereto or for retiring the bonded indebtedness upon said sewerage system; but if said surplus fund is used to retire outstanding sewer bonds, the same shall be in addition to the money derived by taxation for such retirement of sewer bonds as is provided by law.

Any municipality or incorporated sewer or sanitary district which is being provided with services by the governing body fixing such rates and charges is subject to the same charges and rates established as provided in this part 6 or to charges and rates established in harmony therewith for service rendered such municipality or incorporated sewer or sanitary district and shall pay such rates or charges when due, and the same shall be deemed to be a part of the revenues of the works and shall be applied as provided in this section for the application of such revenues.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1267, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-516 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-617. Failure to pay rates and charges - lien.

In the event any user of said sewerage system neglects, fails, or refuses to pay the rates and charges fixed by said governing body for the connection with and use of said sewer, said user shall not be disconnected from said sewerage system or refused the use of said sewer unless the user is outside the municipal limits, but the rates and charges due therefor may be certified by the clerk or the proper authority of the district to the board of county commissioners of the county in which said delinquent user's property is located and shall become a lien upon the real property so served by said sewer connection. The amount due shall be collected in the manner as though they were part of the taxes.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1267, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-517 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-618. Prior rates and charges declared valid.

Any such rates and charges for the connections with and use of the sewer or sewerage systems of any municipality or incorporated sewer or sanitary district declared or established by ordinance of said governing body on or before May 1, 1957, are declared to be valid and are hereby ratified.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1267, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-518 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-619. Surplus revenue diverted to general fund.

The municipality may by ordinance divert to the general fund any surplus moneys in excess of the amounts reasonably required for the purpose of operating, renewing, improving, or extending the sewer system of any municipality.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1267, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-519 as it existed prior to 1975.